California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(a) (1) Before March 1, 2022, the commission shall, as part of an existing proceeding, adopt updated rules for the lifeline program establishing a modified recertification process that minimizes barriers to lifeline subscriber recertification and reduces the burden and cost of recertification on the lifeline program.

(2) The updated rules adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall do all of the following:

(A) Enable a lifeline subscriber to enroll in the lifeline program directly online using an electronic signature.

(B) Enable a
 lifeline subscriber to complete the annual recertification of lifeline eligibility process directly online using an electronic signature, or by telephone using a telephonic signature. The lifeline program’s third-party administrator shall verify the lifeline subscriber’s identity using the personally identifiable information that the administrator has on file. The commission shall not require a lifeline subscriber to use a commission-issued personal identification number (PIN) for identity verification.

(C) Provide an option for lifeline subscribers to receive communications regarding their lifeline subscription in an electronic format, including, but not limited to, email and short message service.

(b) Before January 1, 2023, the commission shall, as part of an existing proceeding and in consultation with lifeline service providers, the Federal Communications Commission, and the Universal Service Administrative Company, adopt updated rules for the lifeline program with the goal of achieving recertification rates at least equivalent to those rates achieved by the Universal Services Administrative Company as the administrator for the federal lifeline program.

(c) The commission shall annually publicly report on its internet website the participation and recertification rates of eligible lifeline subscribers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 410, Sec. 1.   (AB 74)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

879.

(a) The commission shall, at least annually, initiate a proceeding to set rates for lifeline telephone service. All telephone corporations providing lifeline telephone service shall annually file, on a date set by the commission, proposed lifeline telephone service rates and a statement of projected revenue needs to meet the funding requirements to provide lifeline telephone service to qualified subscribers, together with proposed funding methods to provide the necessary funding. These funding methods shall include identification of those services whose rates shall be adjusted to provide the necessary funding.

(b) The commission shall commence a proceeding within 30 days after the date set for the filings required in subdivision (a), giving interested parties an opportunity to comment on the proposed rates and funding requirements and the proposed funding methods. The commission may change the rates, funding requirements, and funding methods proposed by the telephone corporations in any manner necessary, including reasonably spreading the funding among the services offered by the telephone corporations, to meet the public interest. Within 60 days of the annual filing, the commission shall issue an order setting lifeline telephone service rates and funding methods for each telephone corporation making a filing as required in subdivision (a). The commission may establish a lifeline service pool composed of the rate adjustments and surcharges imposed by the commission pursuant to this section for the purpose of funding lifeline telephone service.

(c) Any order issued by the commission pursuant to this section shall require telephone corporations providing lifeline telephone service to apply the funding requirement in the form of a surcharge to service rates which may be separately identified on the bills of customers using those services. The commission shall not allow any surcharge under this section on the rates charged by those telephone corporations for lifeline telephone service.

(d) The commission shall permit telephone corporations operating between service areas to adjust the rates of any service which may be affected by any surcharge imposed by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 354, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

879.5.

Notwithstanding Section 879, the commission shall issue its initial order adopting required rates and funding requirements not later than October 31, 1987, and prior to the issuance of that order, may fund lifeline telephone service through the use of an interim surcharge on service rates for telephone service provided by telephone corporations operating between service areas. The interim surcharge shall not exceed 4 percent of the service rates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 354, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

880.

The commission may determine any question of fact in its administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 163, Sec. 2.   Effective July 16, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

882.

(a) The Public Utilities Commission shall, as soon as practicable, open a proceeding or proceedings to, or as part of existing proceedings shall, consider ways to ensure that advanced telecommunications services are made available as ubiquitously and economically as possible, in a timely fashion, to California’s citizens, institutions, and businesses. The proceeding or proceedings should be completed within one year of commencement.

(b) The proceeding or proceedings shall develop rules, procedures, orders, or strategies, or all of these, that seek to achieve the following goals:

(1) To provide all citizens and businesses with access to the widest possible array of advanced communications services.

(2) To provide the state’s educational and health care institutions with access to advanced communications services.

(3) To ensure cost-effective deployment of technology so as to protect ratepayers’ interests and the affordability of telecommunications services.

(c) In the proceeding or proceedings, the commission should also consider, but need not limit its consideration to, all of the following:

(1) Whether the definition of universal service should be broadened.

(2) How to encourage the timely and economic development of an advanced public communications infrastructure, which may include a variety of competitive providers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

883.

(a) The commission shall, on or before February 1, 2001, issue an order initiating an investigation and opening a proceeding to examine the current and future definitions of universal service. That proceeding shall include public hearings that encourage participation by a broad and diverse range of interests from all areas of the state, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Consumer groups.

(2) Communication service providers, including all providers of high-speed access services.

(3) Facilities-based telephone providers.

(4) Information service providers and Internet access providers.

(5) Rural and urban users.

(6) Public interest groups.

(7) Representatives of small and large businesses and industry.

(8) Local agencies.

(9) State agencies, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The Government Operations Agency.

(B) The State Department of Education.

(C) The
 State Department of Public Health.

(D) The California State Library.

(10) Colleges and universities.

(b) The objectives of the proceeding set forth in subdivision (a) shall include all of the following:

(1) To investigate the feasibility of redefining universal service in light of current trends toward accelerated convergence of voice, video, and data, with an emphasis on the role of basic telecommunications and Internet services in the workplace, in education and workforce training, access to health care, and increased public safety.

(2) To evaluate the extent to which technological changes have reduced
 the relevance of existing regulatory regimes given their current segmentation based upon technology.

(3) To receive broad-based input from a cross section of
 interested parties and make recommendations on whether video, data, and Internet service providers should be incorporated into an enhanced Universal Lifeline Service program, as specified, including relevant policy recommendations regarding regulatory and statutory changes and funding options that are consistent with the principles set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 871.7.

(4) To reevaluate prior definitions of basic service in a manner that will, to the extent feasible, effectively incorporate the latest technologies to provide all California residents with all of the following:

(A) Improved quality of life.

(B) Expanded access to public and private resources for education, training, and
 commerce.

(C) Increased access to public resources enhancing public health and safety.

(D) Assistance in bridging the “digital divide” through expanded access to new technologies by low income, disabled, or otherwise disadvantaged Californians.

(5) To assess projected costs of providing enhanced universal lifeline service in accordance with the intent of this article, and to delineate the subsidy support needed to maintain the redefined scope of universal service in a competitive market.

(6) To design and recommend an equitable and broad-based subsidy support mechanism for universal service in competitive markets in a manner that conforms with subdivision (c)
 of Section 871.7.

(7) To develop a process to periodically review and revise the definition of universal service to reflect new technologies and markets consistent with subdivision (c) of Section 871.7.

(8) To consider whether similar regulatory treatment for the provision of similar services is appropriate and feasible.

(c) In conducting its investigation, the commission shall take into account the role played by a number of diverse but convergent industries and providers, even though many of these entities are not subject to economic regulation by the commission or any other government entity.

(d) The recommendations of the commission shall be consistent with
 state policies for telecommunications as set forth in Section 709, and with all of the following principles:

(1) Universal service shall, to the extent feasible, be provided at affordable prices regardless of linguistic, cultural, ethnic,
 physical, financial, and geographic considerations.

(2) Consumers shall be provided access to all information needed to allow timely and informed choices about telecommunications products and services that are part of the universal service program and how best to use them.

(3) Education, health care, community, and government institutions shall be positioned as early recipients of new and emerging technologies so as to maximize the economic and social benefits of these services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 425, Sec. 5.   (SB 385)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

884.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that any program administered by the commission that addresses the inequality of access to high-speed broadband services by providing those services to schools and libraries at a discounted price, provide comparable discounts to a nonprofit community technology program.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law or existing program of the commission, but consistent with the purposes for which those funds were appropriated from the California Teleconnect Fund Administrative Committee Fund in Item 8660-001-0493 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2003 (Chapter 157 of the Statutes of 2003), and reappropriated in Item 8660-491 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2006 (Chapter 47 of the Statutes of 2006), the commission may expend up to two million dollars ($2,000,000) of the unencumbered amount of those funds for the nonrecurring installation costs for high-speed broadband services for community organizations that are eligible for discounted rates pursuant to Section 280.

(c) For the purpose of this section:

(1) “High-speed broadband services” means a system for the digital transmission of information over the Internet at a speed of at least 384 kilobits per second.

(2) “Nonprofit community technology program” means a community-based nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and engages in diffusing technology into local communities and training local communities that have no access to, or have limited access to, the Internet and advanced telecommunications technologies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 870, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

884.2.

The commission may require each internet service provider, as defined in Section 3100 of the Civil Code, to report the following information regarding each free, low-cost, income-qualified, or affordable internet service plan advertised by the provider:

(a) The cost of the plan, including any fees and taxes.

(b) The eligibility requirements for the plan.

(c) The data limitations of the plan.

(d) The number of California residents enrolled in the plan.

(e) A description of the outreach efforts undertaken by the
 provider to eligible populations to increase awareness about the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 658, Sec. 4.   (AB 14)   Effective October 8, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

884.5.

(a) This section shall apply to all customers eligible to receive discounts for telecommunications services under the federal Universal Service E-rate program administered by the Schools and Libraries Division of the Universal Service Administrative Company that also apply for discounts on telecommunications services provided through the California Teleconnect Fund Administrative Committee Fund program pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 280.

(b) A teleconnect discount shall be applied after applying an E-rate discount. The commission shall first apply an E-rate discount, regardless of whether the customer has applied for an E-rate discount or has been approved, if the customer, in the determination of the commission, meets the eligibility requirements for an E-rate discount.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the teleconnect discount shall be applied without regard to an E-rate discount for a school district that meets the conditions specified for compensation pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 42280) of Chapter 7 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Education Code, unless that school district has applied for, and been approved to receive, the E-rate discount.

(d) In establishing a discount under the California Teleconnect Fund Administrative Committee Fund program, the commission shall give priority to bridging the “digital divide” by encouraging expanded access to state-of-the-art technologies for rural, inner-city, low-income, and disabled Californians.

(e) As used in this section:

(1) “E-rate discount” means an actual discount under the E-rate program, or a representative discount figure as determined by the commission.

(2) “E-rate program” means the federal Universal Service E-rate program administered by the Schools and Libraries Division of the Universal Service Administrative Company.

(3) “Teleconnect discount” means a discount on telecommunications services provided through the California Teleconnect Fund Administrative Committee Fund program set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 280.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 195.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Telephone Prepaid Debit Cards [885. - 887.]

885.

(a) Any entity offering the services of telephone prepaid debit cards is subject to the registration requirements of Section 1013, commencing January 1, 1999, unless that entity is certificated by the commission to provide telephone service. An entity subject to this requirement includes any of the following:

(1) An entity that is an underlying interexchange carrier and offers and administers the services of telephone prepaid debit cards.

(2) An entity that purchases bulk time from an underlying interexchange carrier and thereby offers and administers the services of telephone prepaid debit cards (that is, the entity repackages and resells the time as prepaid debit cards).

(b) Resellers of telephone prepaid debit cards who do not engage in any of the activities described in subdivision (a) are not subject to the registration requirement imposed by subdivision (a). Resellers that are not subject to the registration requirement imposed by subdivision (a) include both of the following:

(1) Retailers who only provide a marketing venue for telephone prepaid debit cards.

(2) Entities that only print information on telephone prepaid debit cards.

(c) Telephone prepaid debit cards offered in a promotional manner or gratis shall not subject the provider to the registration requirement imposed by subdivision (a), unless the cards are issued in conjunction with the sale of related goods or services.

(d) The commission shall maintain a list of certificated interexchange carriers and shall supply that information upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 799, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

886.

Entities that are required to register, but have failed to do so, or entities that are denied registration by the commission, shall not offer the services of telephone prepaid debit cards. Entities that are required to register, but have failed to do so, and entities denied registration that offer telephone prepaid debit cards shall be subject to fines or other sanctions that may be ordered by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 799, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

887.

The commission may enforce the standards and requirements of Section 17538.9 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 745, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Natural Gas Surcharge [890. - 900.]

890.

(a) On and after January 1, 2001, there shall be imposed a surcharge on all natural gas consumed in this state. The commission shall establish a surcharge to fund low-income assistance programs required by Sections 739.1, 739.2, and 2790 and cost-effective energy efficiency and conservation activities and public interest research and development authorized by Section 740 and not adequately provided by the competitive and regulated markets. Upon implementation of this article, funding for those programs shall be removed from the rates of gas utilities.

(b) (1) Except as specified in Section 898, a public utility gas corporation, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 891, shall collect the surcharge imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) from any person consuming natural gas in this state who receives gas service from the public utility gas corporation.

(2) A public utility gas corporation is relieved from liability to collect the surcharge insofar as the base upon which the surcharge is imposed is represented by accounts which have been found to be worthless and charged off in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. If the public utility gas corporation has previously paid the amount of the surcharge it may, under regulations prescribed by the State Board of Equalization, take as a deduction on its return the amount found to be worthless and charged off. If any accounts are thereafter collected in whole or in part, the surcharge so collected shall be paid with the first return filed after that collection. The commission may by regulation promulgate other rules with respect to uncollected or worthless accounts as it determines to be necessary to the fair and efficient administration of this part.

(c) Except as specified in Section 898, all persons consuming natural gas in this state that has been transported by an interstate pipeline, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 891, shall be liable for the surcharge imposed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) The commission shall annually determine the amount of money required for the following year to administer this chapter and fund the natural gas related programs described in subdivision (a) for the service territory of each public utility gas corporation.

(e) The commission shall annually establish a surcharge rate for each class of customer for the service territory of each public utility gas corporation. A customer of an interstate gas pipeline, as defined in Section 891, shall pay the same surcharge rate as the customer would pay if the customer received service from the public utility gas corporation in whose service territory the customer is located. The commission shall determine the total volume of retail natural gas transported within the service territory of a utility gas provider, that is not subject to exemption pursuant to Section 896, for the purpose of establishing the surcharge rate.

(f) The commission shall allocate the surcharge for gas used by all customers, including those customers who were not subject to the surcharge prior to January 1, 2001.

(g) The commission shall notify the State Board of Equalization of the surcharge rate for each class of customer served by an interstate pipeline in the service territory of a public utility gas corporation.

(h) The State Board of Equalization shall notify each person who consumes natural gas delivered by an interstate pipeline of the surcharge rate for each class of customer within the service territory of a public utility gas corporation.

(i) The surcharge imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be in addition to any other charges for natural gas sold or transported for consumption in this state. Effective on July 1, 2001, the surcharge imposed pursuant to this article shall be identified as a separate line item on the bill of a customer of a public utility gas corporation.

(j) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), public utility gas corporations shall continue to collect in rates those costs of programs described in subdivision (a) of Section 890 that are uncollected prior to the operative date of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 932, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

891.

(a) “Gas utility” means any public utility gas corporation or interstate pipeline as defined in this section.

(b) “Public utility gas corporation” means a public utility gas corporation as defined in Section 216.

(c) “Interstate pipeline” means any entity that owns or operates a natural gas pipeline delivering natural gas to consumers in the state and is subject to rate regulation by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.

(d) Each gas utility shall notify the State Board of Equalization of its status under this section. Each person who consumes natural gas delivered by an interstate pipeline shall annually register with the State Board of Equalization. The State Board of Equalization may require any documentation that it determines to be necessary to implement this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 932, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

892.

The revenue from the surcharge imposed pursuant to this article and collected by a public utility gas corporation shall be paid to the State Board of Equalization in the form of remittances. Persons consuming natural gas delivered by an interstate pipeline shall pay the surcharge to the State Board of Equalization in the form of remittances. The board shall transmit the payments to the Treasurer who shall deposit the payments in the Gas Consumption Surcharge Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 932, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

892.1.

The surcharges imposed by this part and the amounts thereof required to be collected by public utility gas corporations are due quarterly on or before the last day of the month next succeeding each calendar quarter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 932, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

892.2.

On or before the last day of the month following each calendar quarter, a return for the preceding quarterly period shall be filed with the State Board of Equalization in such form as the board may prescribe. A return shall be filed by every public utility gas corporation, and by every person consuming, as defined in this article, natural gas transported by a provider other than the public utility gas corporation. The return shall be signed by the person required to file the return or by his or her duly authorized agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 932, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

893.

The State Board of Equalization shall administer the surcharge imposed pursuant to this article in accordance with the Fee Collection Procedures Law (Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 932, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

894.

The State Board of Equalization may collect any unpaid surcharge imposed pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 932, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

895.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys in the Gas Consumption Surcharge Fund are continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, as follows:

(a) To the commission or an entity designated by the commission to fund programs described in subdivision (a) of Section 890. If the commission designates the Energy Commission to receive funds for public interest research and development, both of the following shall apply:

(1) The Controller shall transfer the funds to a separate subaccount within the Public Interest Research, Development, and Demonstration
 Fund. Notwithstanding Section 384 of this code and Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys in the subaccount are continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to pay the Energy Commission for its costs in carrying out its duties and responsibilities under this article.

(2) The Energy Commission may administer the program pursuant to Chapter 7.1 (commencing with Section 25620) of Division 15 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) To pay the commission for its costs in carrying out its duties and responsibilities under this article.

(c) To pay the State Board of Equalization for its costs in administering this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 76.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

896.

“Consumption” means the use or employment of natural gas. Consumption does not include the use or employment of natural gas to generate power for sale, the sale or purchase of natural gas for resale to end users, the sale or use of gas for enhanced oil recovery, natural gas utilized in cogeneration technology projects to produce electricity, or natural gas that is produced in California and transported on a proprietary pipeline. Consumption does not include the consumption of natural gas which this state is prohibited from taxing under the United States Constitution or the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 932, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

897.

Nothing in this article impairs the rights and obligations of parties to contracts approved by the commission, as the rights and obligations were interpreted as of January 1, 1998.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 932, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

898.

Notwithstanding Section 890, a municipality, district, or public agency that offers in published tariffs home weatherization services, rate assistance for low-income customers, or programs similar to those described in subdivision (a) of Section 890, shall not be required to collect a surcharge pursuant to this article from customers within its service territory. A municipality, district, or public agency shall be required to collect a surcharge pursuant to this article from customers served by the municipality, district, or public agency outside of its service territory unless the commission determines that the entity offers those customers services similar to those offered by gas utilities as described in subdivision (a) of Section 890.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 932, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

899.

Sections 890 and 892 do not apply to any gas customer of a municipality, district, or public agency exempted by Section 898 from collecting a surcharge.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 932, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

900.

The commission shall determine the most efficient and cost-effective way to provide programs pursuant to Sections 739.1, 739.2, and 2790 in a consistent manner statewide by utility provider service territory. In determining the most cost-effective way to provide service that benefits persons eligible for low-income programs, the commission shall consider factors, including, but not limited to, outreach efforts to reach the targeted population and the types of discounts and services that should be provided by each utility. On or before July 1, 2001, the commission shall develop and implement efficient and cost-effective programs pursuant to Sections 739.1, 739.2, and 2790. The commission may conduct compliance audits to ensure compliance with any commission order or resolution relating to the implementation of programs pursuant to Sections 739.1, 739.2, and 2790, and may conduct financial audits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 932, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Reports to the Legislature [910. - 920.]

910.

(a) The commission shall develop, publish, and annually update a report that contains all of the following information:

(1) A workplan that describes in clear detail the scheduled proceedings and other decisions that may be considered by the commission during the calendar year.

(2) Performance criteria for the commission and the executive director, and an evaluation of the performance of the executive director during the previous year based on criteria established in the prior year’s workplan.

(3) An accounting of the commission’s transactions and proceedings from the
 prior year, together with other facts, suggestions, and recommendations that the commission deems of value to the people of the state. The accounting shall include the activities that the commission has taken, and plans to take, to reduce the costs of, and the rates for, water and energy, including electricity, to improve the competitiveness of the state’s industries, including agriculture, and, to the extent possible, shall include suggestions and recommendations for the reduction of those costs and rates.

(4) A description of activities taken and processes instituted to both solicit the input of customers from diverse regions of the state in ratesetting and quasi-legislative proceedings and to process that input in a way that makes it usable in commission decisionmaking. The report shall describe the successes and challenges of these processes,
 the effect of resource constraints, and efforts to be made during the calendar year to further the goal of increased public participation.

(5) A list of the public meetings held outside San Francisco in the previous year, and a schedule of meetings anticipated to be held outside San Francisco during the coming year.

(6) A description of the actions taken by the commission using the information provided to it pursuant to Section 53122 of the Government Code, a summary of deenergization event trends and the effect of deenergization events on telecommunications service and public safety, and an analysis of how the impacts of deenergization events on telecommunications service could be mitigated.

(7) A description
 of the audits and inspections conducted to ensure compliance with the commission’s backup electricity rules for providers of telecommunications service, including, but not limited to, the total number of violations identified by the commission in the prior year, aggregated by company, and a summary of enforcement actions taken for those violations.

(b) (1) The commission shall submit the report required pursuant to subdivision (a) to the Governor and the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, no later than February 1 of each year.

(2) The commission shall post the report in a conspicuous area of its internet website and shall have a program to disseminate the information in the report using computer mailing lists to provide regular updates on the information to those members of the public and organizations that request that information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 740, Sec. 1.   (AB 2765)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

910.1.

(a) The commission shall annually submit a report to the Legislature on the commission’s timeliness in resolving cases, information on the disposition of applications for rehearings, and the days that commissioners presided in and attended hearings. The report shall include the number of scoping memos issued in each proceeding and the number of orders issued extending the statutory deadlines pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 1701.2, for all adjudication cases, and pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1701.5, for all ratesetting or quasi-legislative cases.

(b) For reporting on commissioner attendance at hearings, the report shall include reporting based on attendance at all types of hearings,
 including by all of the following:

(1) Hearing type, including, but not limited to, prehearing conferences, evidentiary hearings, public participation hearings, and workshops.

(2) Proceeding type, including quasi-legislative, an adjudication, a rate-setting, or a catastrophic wildfire proceeding.

(3) Industry type, including electric, gas, water, telecommunications, or transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 205, Sec. 1.   (AB 1532)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

910.2.

(a) The commission shall report to the Legislature the collections from each class of utility and expenditures, both direct and indirect, for regulatory and other authorized commission activities affecting each class. Where expenditures are for overhead, allocations of services common to several classes, or for commission-wide activities, the methods used to calculate the expenditures attributed to the class shall be described in reasonable detail.

(b) The report shall be furnished to the Legislature within 60 days after the end of the fiscal year, and shall be subject to audit. The commission shall maintain information and reports necessary to perform an audit pursuant to this
 section.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 432.5 by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 14.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

910.3.

(a) (1) The commission shall provide a report to the Legislature on September 1 of each year, on the progress of activities undertaken by each electrical corporation, gas corporation, water corporation, wireless telecommunications service provider, electric service provider, and telephone corporation with gross annual California revenues exceeding twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), by each community choice aggregator with gross annual revenues exceeding fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000), and by each electrical corporation, gas corporation, water corporation, wireless telecommunications service provider, electric service provider, and telephone corporation with gross annual California revenues exceeding fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000), but not more than twenty-five million dollars
 ($25,000,000), in the implementation of women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprise development programs pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 8281) of Chapter 7 of Division 4. The report shall include information about which procurements are made with women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprises with at least a majority of the enterprise’s workforce in California, to the extent that information is readily accessible. The commission shall recommend a program for carrying out the policy declared in Article 5 (commencing with Section 8281) of Chapter 7 of Division 4, together with recommendations for legislation that it deems necessary or desirable to further that policy. The commission shall make the report available on its internet website.

(2) (A) As part of the annual report, the commission may include an analysis of the information described in subdivision (b) of Section
 8284 to gauge the efficacy of the programs established pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 8281) of Chapter 7 of Division 4 in attracting business for contractors and subcontractors operating in California.

(B) If the commission includes the analysis described in subparagraph (A), the commission shall also, as part of that annual report, analyze the information provided to the commission pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 8290.2.

(b) In regard to disabled veteran business enterprises, the commission shall ensure that the programs and legislation recommended pursuant to subdivision (a) are consistent with the disabled veteran business enterprise certification eligibility requirements imposed by the Department of General Services and that the recommendations include only those disabled veteran business enterprises certified by the Department of General
 Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 784, Sec. 2.   (SB 1177)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

910.4.

By February 1 of each year, the commission shall report to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature, on all sources and amounts of funding and actual and proposed expenditures, both in the two prior fiscal years and for the proposed fiscal year, including any costs to ratepayers, related to all of the following:

(a) Entities or programs established by the commission by order, decision, motion, settlement, or other action, including, but not limited to, the California Clean Energy Fund, the California Emerging Technology Fund, and the Pacific Forest and Watershed Lands Stewardship Council. The report shall contain descriptions of relevant issues, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Any governance structure established for an entity or program.

(2) Any staff or employees hired by or for the entity or program and their salaries and expenses.

(3) Any staff or employees transferred or loaned internally or interdepartmentally for the entity or program and their salaries and expenses.

(4) Any contracts entered into by the entity or program, the funding sources for those contracts, and the legislative authority under which the commission entered into the contract.
